Hawaii, session 2025, HB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds the State needs to provide monetary incentives to recruit teachers and promote longevity in the field. Further, general education teachers who teach special education inclusion classes alongside special education teachers should be entitled to the same pay differential.  The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish the Onipaʻa Teacher Bonus Program which provides monetary awards to licensed and certified teachers who practice in the State for an extended period of time; and (2)  Ensure that general education teachers teaching special education inclusion classes are equitably compensated. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-  Onipaʻa Teacher Bonus Program.  (a)  The department shall establish a teacher bonus program which provides bonuses to teachers in the department of education who exemplify high teacher standards and accomplished teaching through means deemed appropriate by the board of education.  Each school must submit a report concerning the use of money distributed by the department.  The department must provide a summary of the reports to the board and the legislature. (b)  The program shall be outlined by the following provisions: (1)  Beginning after the effective date of this Act, a teacher that is considered a full-time employee of the department and teaches for two school years in such school shall be eligible to apply for the bonuses pursuant in this section; (2)  The department shall award bonuses to any eligible teacher who applies and meets the requirements of this section; (3)  The department shall develop and administer the Onipaʻa Teacher Bonus Program.  The program shall consist of a series of bonuses available to eligible teachers who meet the qualifications of this section.  Such bonuses include the "Ola Professional Performance" bonus and the "Ola Loa Longevity" bonuses; (4)  The department shall maintain the records related to the program and any teacher receiving a bonus pursuant to the program, including tracking teacher demographics, the number of years a teacher has taught, the annual income a teacher receives from teaching, the school and location a teacher teaches at, and any other information the department may require.  The department shall share such information except as aggregate data that does not include personally identifiable information for any particular teacher; (5)  The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section; (6)  The "Ola Professional Performance" bonus awards shall be awarded to an eligible teacher who has been practicing within the State for at least two school years; provided that, this award shall total no more than two thousand five hundred dollars; and (7)  The "Ola Loa Longevity" bonus awards shall be awarded to an eligible teacher who has been practicing within the State for at least five school years.  The teacher shall be eligible for receiving this bonus award on a recurring basis every five years; provided that, each issued award shall total no more than five thousand dollars. (c)  As used in this section: "Bonus" means a non-base, building payment that is in addition to a teacher's regular salary and that is awarded based on outstanding service and awarded to a full-time teacher who satisfies the licensing and certification as outlined in chapter 302A-805, Hawaii Revised Statutes. "Department" means the department of education. "Board" means the board of education." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-630, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-630  [[]Teachers; additional benefits or credits.[]]  (a)  Teachers with special assignments, where their responsibilities are greater, may be provided additional benefits by the department. (b) Teachers in Hawaiian language medium education whose responsibilities are greater or unique and require additional language skills may be provided additional benefits by the department. (c) In determining additional benefits for vocational agriculture and technical school teachers, the department may allow credit for practical experience. (d) In determining additional benefits for teachers, staff, and administrators in Hawaiian language medium education, the department may allow credit for practical experience. (e) In determining additional benefits for special education teachers, the department shall include general education teachers who teach special education inclusion classes as equally qualified for the additional benefits." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the funding of the Onipaʻa Teacher Bonus Program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________